lexc/verb/enhuigek.lexc
LEXICON Case1eml
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igea§sz #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^i       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igea§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igea§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igea§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igea§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igea§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igea§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igea§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igea§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igea§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igea§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§igea§l§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igea§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

! gyötör:gyötr
LEXICON AddVerboeml
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoeml;
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Imperoeml;

LEXICON Repoeml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^enem #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^ened #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^eni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^en§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^enetek #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^eni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^eni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^eni  #;
                    Case1oeml;

LEXICON Imperoeml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^enem #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^ened #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^eni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^en§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^enetek #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^eni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^eni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^eni  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrepoeml;
                      Case1oeml;

LEXICON Nrepoeml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoeml;
                      NImper2oeml;

LEXICON NImperoeml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeml;
                      Pot2oeml;
LEXICON NImper2oeml
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Potoeml;
                      Pot2oeml;

LEXICON Potoeml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeml;
             Caseoeml;
LEXICON Pot2oeml
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfoeml;
             Caseoeml;
LEXICON AddInfoeml
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoe§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoe§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoe§t§igeoe§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
          Caseoeml;

LEXICON Caseoeml
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeoe§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^sz #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeoe§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeoe§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^i       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeoe§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
!+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d         #;
!+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeoe§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igea§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igea§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§tek      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Verb
agyongyötör:agyongyötr AddVerboeml;
csőröl:csőrl AddVerboeml;
csűröl:csűrl AddVerboeml;
eszközöl:eszközl AddVerboeml;
gyötör:gyötr AddVerboeml;
köcsögöl:köcsögl AddVerboeml;
könyököl:könyökl AddVerboeml;
közöl:közl AddVerboeml;
mérnököl:mérnökl AddVerboeml;
pöröl:pörl AddVerboeml;
töröl:törl AddVerboeml;
védnököl:védnökl AddVerboeml;
ülnököl:ülnökl AddVerboeml;
őröl:őrl AddVerboeml;
